District of Columbia statutes.
31-1371.01

Application.

This chapter shall apply only to investments and investment practices of domestic insurers and United States branches of non-U.S. insurers that are authorized to use the District of Columbia as a state of entry to transact insurance through its United States branch under § 31-2202. This chapter shall not apply to separate accounts of an insurer pertaining to variable or modified guaranteed contracts.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 101, 50 DCR 330
This section is referenced in § 31-1372.01, § 31-3931.07, and § 31-5031.07.